Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.160

Board of trustees—Vacancies.

Any vacancy in the board of trustees shall be filled by appointment by the county legislative authority making the original appointment, and such appointee shall hold office for the remainder of the term of the trustee replaced.

[ 1984 c 26 s 13; 1963 c 4 s 36.62.160. Prior: 1933 c 174 s 1, part; 1931 c 139 s 3, part; RRS s 6090-11, part.]